District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.10

Necessary or convenient powers.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law or regulation, a universal bank may exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect the purposes for which the universal bank is organized or to further a business, activity, or operation in which the universal bank is lawfully engaged. The Commissioner may, by rule or order, establish that certain powers shall not be considered necessary or convenient to effect the purposes for which a universal bank is organized or to further a business, activity, or operation in which a universal bank is lawfully engaged.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 210, 48 DCR 3244